California statutes. Penal Code
-------------------------------------------

1353.

The application may be made to the Court, or a Judge thereof, and must be upon three days’ notice to the District Attorney.

(History: Amended by Code Amendments 1880, Ch. 25.)
-------------------------------------------

1354.

If the Court to whom the application is made is satisfied of the truth of the facts stated, and that the examination of the witness is necessary to the attainment of justice, an order must be made that a commission be issued to take his testimony; and the Court may insert in the order a direction that the trial be stayed for a specified time, reasonably sufficient for the execution and return of the commission.

(History: Amended by Code Amendments 1880, Ch. 47.)
-------------------------------------------

1355.

When the commission is ordered, the defendant must serve upon the District Attorney, without delay, a copy of the interrogatories to be annexed thereto, with two days’ notice of the time at which they will be presented to the Court or Judge. The District Attorney may in like manner serve upon the defendant or his counsel cross-interrogatories, to be annexed to the commission, with the like notice. In the interrogatories either party may insert any questions pertinent to the issue. When the interrogatories and cross-interrogatories are presented to the Court or Judge, according to the notice given, the Court or Judge must modify the questions so as to conform them to the rules of evidence, and must indorse upon them his allowance and annex them to the commission.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1356.

Unless the parties otherwise consent, by an indorsement upon the commission, the Court or Judge must indorse thereon a direction as to the manner in which it must be returned, and may, in his discretion, direct that it be returned by mail or otherwise, addressed to the Clerk of the Court in which the action is pending, designating his name and the place where his office is kept.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1357.

The commissioner, unless otherwise specially directed, may execute the commission in the following order:

(a) He or she shall publicly administer an oath to the witness that his or her answers given to the interrogatories shall be the truth, the whole truth, and nothing but the truth.

(b) He or she shall cause the examination of the witness to be reduced to writing and subscribed by the witness.

(c) He or she shall write the answers of the witness as near as possible in the language in which he or she gives them, and read to the witness each answer as it is taken down, and correct or add to it until it conforms to what he or she declares is the truth.

(d) If the witness declines to answer a question, that fact, with the reason assigned by him or her for declining, shall be stated.

(e) If any papers or documents are produced before him or her and proved by the witness, they, or copies of them, shall be annexed to the deposition subscribed by the witness and certified by the commissioner.

(f) The commissioner shall subscribe his or her name to each sheet of the deposition, and annex the deposition, with the papers and documents proved by the witness, or copies thereof, to the commission, and shall close it up under seal, and address it as directed by the indorsement thereon.

(g) If there is a direction on the commission to return it by mail, the commissioner shall immediately deposit it in the nearest post office. If any other direction is made by the written consent of the parties, or by the court or judge, on the commission, as to its return, the commissioner shall comply with the direction.

A copy of this section shall be annexed to the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1360, Sec. 115.)
-------------------------------------------

1358.

If the commission and return be delivered by the Commissioner to an agent, he must deliver the same to the Clerk to whom it is directed, or to the Judge of the Court in which the action is pending, by whom it may be received and opened, upon the agent making affidavit that he received it from the hands of the Commissioner, and that it has not been opened or altered since he received it.

(History: Amended by Code Amendments 1880, Ch. 47.)
-------------------------------------------

1359.

If the agent is dead, or from sickness or other casualty unable personally to deliver the commission and return, as prescribed in the last section, it may be received by the Clerk or Judge from any other person, upon his making an affidavit that he received it from the agent; that the agent is dead, or from sickness or other casualty unable to deliver it; that it has not been opened or altered since the person making the affidavit received it; and that he believes it has not been opened or altered since it came from the hands of the Commissioner.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1360.

The clerk or judge receiving and opening the commission and return shall immediately file it, with the affidavit mentioned in Sections 1358 and 1359, in the office of the clerk of the court in which the indictment is pending. If the commission and return is transmitted by mail, the clerk to whom it is addressed shall receive it from the post office, and open and file it in his or her office, where it must remain, unless otherwise directed by the court or judge.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 828, Sec. 89.)
-------------------------------------------

1361.

The commission and return must at all times be open to the inspection of the parties, who must be furnished by the Clerk with copies of the same or of any part thereof, on payment of his fees.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1362.

The depositions taken under the commission may be read in evidence by either party on the trial if the court finds that the witness is unavailable as a witness within the meaning of Section 240 of the Evidence Code. The same objections may be taken to a question in the interrogatories or to an answer in the deposition as if the witness had been examined orally in court.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 299.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Inquiry into the Competence of the Defendant Before Trial or After Conviction [1367. - 1376.]

1367.

(a) A person shall not be tried or adjudged to punishment or have their probation, mandatory supervision, postrelease community supervision, or parole revoked while that person is mentally incompetent. A defendant is mentally incompetent for purposes of this chapter if, as a result of a mental
 health disorder or developmental disability, the defendant is unable to understand the nature of the criminal proceedings or to assist counsel in the conduct of a defense in a rational manner.

(b) Section 1370 applies to a person who is charged with a felony or alleged to have violated the terms of probation for a felony or mandatory supervision and is incompetent as a result of a mental health disorder. Section 1370.01 applies to a person who is charged with a misdemeanor or misdemeanors only, or a violation of formal or informal probation for a misdemeanor, and the judge finds reason to believe that the defendant has a mental health disorder, and may, as a result of the mental health disorder, be incompetent to stand trial. Section 1370.1 applies to a person who is incompetent as a result of a developmental disability and
 applies to a person who is incompetent as a result of a mental health disorder, but also has a developmental disability. Section 1370.02 applies to a person alleged to have violated the terms of the person’s postrelease community supervision or parole.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 9, Sec. 4.   (AB 46)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

1368.

(a) If, during the pendency of an action and prior to judgment, or during revocation proceedings for a violation of probation, mandatory supervision, postrelease community supervision, or parole, a doubt arises in the mind of the judge as to the mental competence of the defendant, the judge shall state that doubt in the record and inquire of the attorney for the defendant whether, in the opinion of the attorney, the defendant is mentally competent. If the defendant is not represented by counsel, the court shall appoint counsel. At the request of the defendant or defendant’s counsel or upon its own motion, the court shall recess the proceedings for as long as may be reasonably necessary to permit counsel to confer with the defendant and to form an
 opinion as to the mental competence of the defendant at that point in time.

(b) If counsel informs the court that they believe the defendant is or may be mentally incompetent, the court shall order that the question of the defendant’s mental competence is to be determined pursuant to Sections 1368.1 and 1369. If counsel informs the court that they believe the defendant is mentally competent, the court may nevertheless order a determination by the court of the defendant’s mental competence.

(c) Except as provided in Section 1368.1, when an inquiry into the present mental competence of the defendant has been commenced by the court all proceedings in the criminal prosecution shall be suspended until the question of the present mental competence of the defendant has been
 determined.

If a jury has been impaneled and sworn to try the defendant, the jury shall be discharged only if it appears to the court that undue hardship to the jurors would result if the jury is retained on call.

If the defendant is declared mentally incompetent, the jury shall be discharged.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 646, Sec. 2.   (SB 1323)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1368.1.

(a) (1) If the action is on a complaint charging a felony, proceedings to determine mental competence shall be held prior to the filing of an information unless the counsel for the defendant requests a preliminary examination under Section 859b. At the preliminary examination, counsel for the defendant may either demur, move to dismiss the complaint on the ground that there is not reasonable cause to believe that a felony has been committed and that the defendant is guilty thereof, or make a motion under Section 1538.5.
 A proceeding to determine mental competence or a request for a preliminary examination pursuant to this paragraph does not preclude a request for a determination of probable cause pursuant to paragraph (2).

(2) If the action is on a complaint charging a felony involving death, great bodily harm, or a serious threat to the physical well-being of another person, the prosecuting attorney may, at any time before or after a defendant is determined incompetent to stand trial, request a determination of probable cause to believe the defendant committed the offense or offenses alleged in the complaint, solely for the purpose of establishing that the defendant is gravely disabled pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (h) of Section 5008 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, pursuant to procedures approved by
 the court. In making this determination, the court shall consider using procedures consistent with the manner in which a preliminary examination is conducted. A finding of probable cause shall only be made upon the presentation of evidence sufficient to satisfy the standard set forth in subdivision (a) of Section 872. The defendant shall be entitled to a preliminary hearing after the restoration of his or her competence. A request for a determination of probable cause pursuant to this paragraph does not preclude a proceeding to determine mental competence or a request for a preliminary examination pursuant to paragraph (1).

(b) If the action is on a complaint charging a misdemeanor, counsel for the defendant may either demur, move to dismiss the complaint on the
 ground that there is not reasonable cause to believe that a public offense has been committed and that the defendant is guilty thereof, or make a motion under Section 1538.5.

(c) If the proceeding involves an alleged violation of probation, mandatory supervision, postrelease community supervision, or parole, counsel for the defendant may move to reinstate supervision on the ground that there is not probable cause to believe that the defendant violated the terms of his or her supervision.

(d) In ruling upon any demurrer or motion described in subdivision (a), (b), or (c), the court may hear any matter which is capable of fair determination without the personal participation of the defendant.

(e) A demurrer or motion
 described in subdivision (a), (b), or (c) shall be made in the court having jurisdiction over the complaint. The defendant shall not be certified until the demurrer or motion has been decided.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 246, Sec. 1.   (SB 684)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

1369.

A determination of the question of mental competence shall proceed in the following order:

(a) (1) The court shall suspend criminal proceedings and shall appoint at least one licensed psychologist or psychiatrist to examine the defendant’s mental condition. If defense counsel informs the court that the defendant is not seeking a finding of mental incompetence, the court shall, upon request of defense counsel, appoint two licensed psychologists or psychiatrists, one to be named by the defense and one to be named by the prosecution.

(2) If it is suspected the defendant has a developmental disability, the court shall appoint the
 director of the regional center established under Division 4.5 (commencing with Section 4500) of the Welfare and Institutions Code, or the director’s designee, to examine the defendant to determine whether the defendant has a developmental disability. The regional center director or their designee shall determine whether the defendant has a developmental disability, as defined in Section 4512 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, and is therefore eligible for regional center services and supports. The regional center director or their designee shall provide the court with a written report informing the court of this determination.

(b) (1) A licensed psychologist or psychiatrist shall evaluate the defendant and submit a written report to the court. The report shall include the opinion of the expert regarding all of
 the following matters: 

(A) A diagnosis of the defendant’s mental condition, if any.

(B) Whether the defendant, as a result of a mental disorder or developmental disability, is able to understand the nature of the criminal proceedings or to assist counsel in the conduct of a defense in a rational manner.

(C) Whether there is a substantial likelihood that the defendant will attain competency in the foreseeable future, with consideration as to whether the defendant would attain competency in response to treatment with antipsychotic medication.

(D) If requested by the defense, an opinion as to whether the
 defendant is eligible for mental health diversion pursuant to Section 1001.36.

(2) (A) The examining licensed psychologists or psychiatrists shall evaluate whether treatment with antipsychotic medication, as defined in subdivision (l ) of Section 5008 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, is appropriate for the defendant. The evaluation of whether treatment with antipsychotic medication is appropriate shall be done in accordance with subparagraphs (B) and (C). The examining licensed psychologists or psychiatrists shall also opine whether the defendant lacks the capacity to make decisions regarding antipsychotic medication, as outlined in subclauses (I) and (II) of clause (i) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 1370.

(B) If a licensed psychologist examines the defendant and opines that treatment with antipsychotic medication may be appropriate, their opinion shall be based on whether the defendant has a mental disorder that is typically known to benefit from that treatment. A licensed psychologist’s opinion shall not exceed the scope of their license. That opinion about the potential benefit of antipsychotic medication is not a prescription for that medication.

(C) If a psychiatrist examines the defendant and opines that treatment with antipsychotic medication is appropriate, the psychiatrist shall inform the court of their opinion as to the likely or potential side effects of the medication, the expected efficacy of the medication, and possible alternative treatments, as outlined in subclause (III) of clause (i) of subparagraph (B) of
 paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 1370.

(c) (1) If neither party objects to any competency report submitted pursuant to subdivision (b), the court may determine the competency of the defendant based on any such competency report. The court shall also determine whether the defendant lacks the capacity to make decisions regarding the administration of antipsychotic medication.

(2) If either party objects to any competency report and requests a hearing, the court shall hold a hearing to determine competence and to determine whether the defendant lacks the capacity to make decisions regarding the administration of antipsychotic medication, pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 1370.

(3) In a hearing to determine competence, the defendant shall be presumed competent to stand trial unless it is proved by a preponderance of the evidence that the defendant is mentally incompetent.

(4) If counsel for the defendant waives the right to a jury trial and the prosecution consents, or as provided in paragraph (5), the hearing shall be heard by the court. Otherwise, a determination of the defendant’s competency to stand trial shall be decided by a jury. The verdict of the jury shall be unanimous. 

(5) In a proceeding for a violation of probation, mandatory supervision, postrelease community supervision, or parole, the hearing shall be heard by the court.

(d) (1) The State Department of State Hospitals, on or before July 1, 2017, shall adopt guidelines for education and training standards for a psychiatrist or licensed psychologist to be considered for appointment by the court pursuant to this section. To develop these guidelines, the State Department of State Hospitals shall convene a workgroup comprised of the Judicial Council and groups or individuals representing judges, defense counsel, district attorneys, counties, advocates for people with developmental and mental disabilities, state psychologists and psychiatrists, professional associations and accrediting bodies for psychologists and psychiatrists, and other interested stakeholders.

(2) When making an appointment pursuant to this section, the court
 shall appoint an expert who meets the guidelines established
 in accordance with this subdivision or an expert with equivalent experience and skills. If there is no reasonably available expert who meets the guidelines or who has equivalent experience and skills, the court may appoint an expert who does not meet the guidelines.

(e) This section does not preclude the court from appointing any other qualified expert to evaluate the defendant’s mental condition in addition to a licensed psychologist or psychiatrist.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 646, Sec. 3.   (SB 1323)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1369.5.

(a) A document submitted to a court pursuant to this chapter, including, but not limited to, Sections 1369, 1370, 1370.01, 1370.1, and 1372, is presumptively confidential, except as
 otherwise provided by law.

(b) A document described in subdivision (a) shall be retained in the confidential portion of the court’s file. Counsel for the defendant and the prosecution shall maintain the documents as confidential.

(c) (1) The defendant, counsel for the defendant, and the prosecution may inspect, copy, or utilize the documents, and any information contained in the documents, without an order from the court for purposes related to the defense, prosecution, treatment, and safety of the defendant, and for the safety of the public.

(2) A motion, application, or petition to
 access
 the documents shall be decided in accordance with subdivision (h) of Rule 2.551 of the California Rules of Court.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 251, Sec. 1.   (SB 557)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

1370.

(a) (1) (A) If the defendant is found mentally competent, the criminal process shall resume, the trial on the offense charged or hearing on the alleged violation shall proceed, and judgment may be pronounced.

(B) If the defendant is found mentally incompetent and is not charged with an offense listed in subdivision (d) of Section 1001.36, the trial, the hearing on the alleged violation, or the judgment shall be suspended, and the court shall do all of the following:

(i) (I) Determine whether restoring the person to mental competence is in the interests of
 justice.

(II) In exercising its discretion pursuant to this clause, the court shall consider the relevant circumstances of the charged offense, including the harm done to the victim, the defendant’s mental health condition, including, without limitation, any intellectual or developmental disability, the history of treatment, the criminal history of the defendant, whether the defendant is likely to face incarceration if convicted, whether the defendant has previously been found incompetent to stand trial, whether restoring the person to mental competence will enhance public safety, and any other relevant considerations. The court shall provide the defense and prosecution an opportunity to be heard on whether restoration is in the interests of justice.

(ii) If restoring the person
 to mental competence is in the interests of justice, the court shall state its reasons orally on the record and the case shall proceed as provided in subparagraph (C).

(iii) If restoring the person to mental competence is not in the interests of justice, the court shall conduct a hearing, pursuant to Section 1001.36, and, if the court deems the defendant eligible, grant diversion pursuant to that section for a period not to exceed two years from the date the individual is accepted into diversion or the maximum term of imprisonment provided by law for the most serious offense charged in the complaint, whichever is shorter.

(I) The hearing shall be held no later than 30 days after the finding of incompetence. If the hearing is delayed beyond 30 days, the court shall order the defendant
 to be released on their own recognizance pending the hearing.

(II) If the defendant performs satisfactorily on diversion pursuant to this subclause, at the end of the period of diversion, the court shall dismiss the criminal charges that were the subject of the criminal proceedings at the time of the initial diversion.

(III) If the court finds the defendant ineligible or unsuitable for diversion based on the circumstances set forth in subdivision (b) or (c) of Section 1001.36, or if any of the conditions described in subdivision (g) of Section 1001.36 are present, the court may, after notice to the defendant, defense counsel, and the prosecution, hold a hearing to determine whether to do any of the following:

(ia) Order modification of the treatment plan in accordance with a recommendation from the treatment provider.

(ib) Refer the defendant to assisted outpatient treatment pursuant to Section 5346 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. A referral to assisted outpatient treatment may only occur in a county where services are available pursuant to Section 5348 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, and the agency agrees to accept responsibility for treatment of the defendant. A hearing to determine eligibility for assisted outpatient treatment shall be held within 45 days after the finding of incompetence. If the hearing is delayed beyond 45 days, the court shall order the defendant, if confined in county jail, to be released on their own recognizance pending that hearing. If the defendant is accepted into assisted outpatient treatment, the charges
 shall be dismissed pursuant to Section 1385.

(ic) Refer the defendant to the county conservatorship investigator in the county of commitment for possible conservatorship proceedings for the defendant pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 5350) of Part 1 of Division 5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. A defendant shall only be referred to the conservatorship investigator if it appears to the court or a qualified mental health expert that the defendant appears to be gravely disabled, as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (h) of Section 5008 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. Any hearings required in the conservatorship proceedings shall be held in the superior court in the county of commitment. The court shall transmit a copy of the order directing initiation of conservatorship proceedings to the county mental health
 director or the director’s designee and shall notify the county mental health director or their designee of the outcome of the proceedings. Before establishing a conservatorship, the public guardian shall investigate all available alternatives to conservatorship pursuant to Section 5354 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. If a petition is not filed within 30 days of the referral, the court shall order the defendant, if confined in county jail, to be released on their own recognizance pending conservatorship proceedings. The charges shall be dismissed pursuant to Section 1385 upon the filing of either a temporary or
 permanent conservatorship petition unless the basis for the petition is that the defendant is gravely disabled as defined in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (h) of Section 5008 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(id) Refer the defendant to the CARE program pursuant to Section 5978 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. A hearing to determine eligibility for the CARE program shall be held within 14 court days after the date on which the petition for the referral is filed. If the hearing is delayed beyond 14 court days, the court shall order the defendant, if confined in county jail, to be released on their own recognizance pending that hearing. If the defendant is accepted into the CARE program, the charges shall be dismissed pursuant to Section 1385.

(ie) Reinstate competency proceedings, in which case the court shall credit any time spent in mental health diversion against the maximum term of commitment as specified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (c).

(C) If the defendant is found mentally incompetent and restoring the defendant to competence is in the interests of justice or they are charged with an offense listed in subdivision (d) of Section 1001.36, the trial, the hearing on the alleged violation, or the judgment shall be suspended until the person becomes mentally competent.

(i) The court shall order that the mentally incompetent defendant be delivered by the sheriff to a State Department of State Hospitals facility, as defined in Section 4100 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, as directed by the
 State Department of State Hospitals, or to any other available public or private treatment facility, including a community-based residential treatment system approved by the community program director, or their designee, that will promote the defendant’s speedy restoration to mental competence, or placed on outpatient status as specified in Section 1600.

(ii) (I) If a defendant has been found mentally incompetent, and the court has ordered commitment to a State Department of State Hospitals facility as described in Section 4100 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, and is not in the custody of the local sheriff, the department shall inform the sheriff when a placement in a facility becomes available and make reasonable efforts to coordinate a delivery by the sheriff to transport the defendant to the facility. If the department
 has made reasonable attempts for 90 days, starting with the date of commitment, and the defendant has not been transported, as originally ordered under clause (i), the department shall inform the court and sheriff in writing.

(II) If the sheriff has not delivered the defendant to a State Department of State Hospitals facility within 90 days after the department’s written notice, the commitment to the State Department of State Hospitals shall be automatically stayed and the department may remove the defendant from the pending placement list until the court notifies the department in writing that the defendant is available for transport and the defendant shall regain their place on the pending placement list.

(iii) However, if the action against the defendant who has been found
 mentally incompetent is on a complaint charging a felony offense specified in Section 290, the prosecutor shall determine whether the defendant previously has been found mentally incompetent to stand trial pursuant to this chapter on a charge of a Section 290 offense, or whether the defendant is currently the subject of a pending Section 1368 proceeding arising out of a charge of a Section 290 offense. If either determination is made, the prosecutor shall notify the court and defendant in writing. After this notification, and opportunity for hearing, the court shall order that the defendant be delivered by the sheriff to a State Department of State Hospitals facility, as directed by the State Department of State Hospitals, or other secure treatment facility for the care and treatment of persons with a mental health disorder, unless the court makes specific findings on the record that an alternative
 placement would provide more appropriate treatment for the defendant and would not pose a danger to the health and safety of others.

(iv) If the action against the defendant who has been found mentally incompetent is on a complaint charging a felony offense specified in Section 290 and the defendant has been denied bail pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 12 of Article I of the California Constitution because the court has found, based upon clear and convincing evidence, a substantial likelihood that the person’s release would result in great bodily harm to others, the court shall order that the defendant be delivered by the sheriff to a State Department of State Hospitals facility, as directed by the State Department of State Hospitals, unless the court makes specific findings on the record that an alternative placement would provide more
 appropriate treatment for the defendant and would not pose a danger to the health and safety of others.

(v) (I) If, at any time after the court finds that the defendant is mentally incompetent and before the defendant is transported to a facility pursuant to this section, the court is provided with any information that the defendant may benefit from diversion pursuant to Chapter 2.8A (commencing with Section 1001.35) of Title 6, the court may make a finding that the defendant is an appropriate candidate for diversion.

(II) Notwithstanding subclause (I), if a defendant is found mentally incompetent and is transferred to a facility described in Section 4361.6 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, the court may, at any time upon receiving any information that the
 defendant may benefit from diversion pursuant to Chapter 2.8A (commencing with Section 1001.35) of Title 6, make a finding that the defendant is an appropriate candidate for diversion.

(vi) If a defendant is found by the court to be an appropriate candidate for diversion pursuant to clause (v), the defendant’s eligibility shall be determined pursuant to Section 1001.36. A defendant granted diversion may participate for the lesser of the period specified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) or the applicable period described in subparagraph (C) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (f) of Section 1001.36. If, during that period, the court determines that criminal proceedings should be reinstated pursuant to subdivision (g) of Section 1001.36, the court shall, pursuant to Section 1369, appoint a psychiatrist, licensed psychologist, or
 any other expert the court may deem appropriate, to determine the defendant’s competence to stand trial.

(vii) Upon the dismissal of charges at the conclusion of the period of diversion, pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1001.36, a defendant shall no longer be deemed incompetent to stand trial pursuant to this section.

(viii) The clerk of the court shall notify the Department of Justice, in writing, of a finding of mental incompetence with respect to a defendant who is subject to clause (iii) or (iv) for inclusion in the defendant’s state summary criminal history information.

(D) If at any time after the finding of mental incompetence, but before the defendant begins treatment in a program or facility to promote the
 defendant’s speedy restoration of mental competence pursuant to this section, there is a change in circumstance that affects the likelihood that the defendant will be able to be attain competence, either party may instead petition the court to proceed in accordance with subdivision (b).

(E) Upon the filing of a certificate of restoration to competence, the court shall order that the defendant be returned to court in accordance with Section 1372. The court shall transmit a copy of its order to the community program director or a designee.

(F) A defendant charged with a violent felony may not be delivered to a State Department of State Hospitals facility or treatment facility pursuant to this subdivision unless the State Department of State Hospitals facility or treatment facility has a
 secured perimeter or a locked and controlled treatment facility, and the judge determines that the public safety will be protected.

(G) For purposes of this paragraph, “violent felony” means an offense specified in subdivision (c) of Section 667.5.

(H) A defendant charged with a violent felony may be placed on outpatient status, as specified in Section 1600, only if the court finds that the placement will not pose a danger to the health or safety of others. If the court places a defendant charged with a violent felony on outpatient status, as specified in Section 1600, the court shall serve copies of the placement order on defense counsel, the sheriff in the county where the defendant will be placed, and the district attorney for the county in which the violent felony
 charges are pending against the defendant.

(I) If, at any time after the court has declared a defendant incompetent to stand trial pursuant to this section, counsel for the defendant or a jail medical or mental health staff provider provides the court with substantial evidence that the defendant’s psychiatric symptoms have changed to such a degree as to create a doubt in the mind of the judge as to the defendant’s current mental incompetence, the court may appoint a psychiatrist or a licensed psychologist to opine as to whether the defendant has attained competence. If, in the opinion of that expert, the defendant has attained competence, the court shall proceed as if a certificate of restoration of competence has been returned pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 1372.

(J) (i) The State Department of State Hospitals may, pursuant to Section 4335.2 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, conduct an evaluation of the defendant in county custody to determine any of the following:

(I) The defendant has attained competence.

(II) There is no substantial likelihood that the defendant will attain competence in the foreseeable future.

(III) The defendant should be referred to the county for further evaluation for potential participation in a county diversion program, if one exists, or to another outpatient treatment program.

(ii) If, in the opinion of the department’s expert, the defendant has attained
 competence, the court shall proceed as if a certificate of restoration of competence has been returned pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 1372.

(iii) If, in the opinion of the department’s expert, there is no
 substantial likelihood that the defendant will attain mental competence in the foreseeable future, the committing court shall proceed pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (c) no later than 10 days following receipt of the report.

(2) Prior to making the order directing that the defendant be committed to the State Department of State Hospitals or other treatment facility or placed on outpatient status, the court shall proceed as follows:

(A) (i) The court shall order the community program director or a designee to evaluate the defendant and to submit to the court within 15 judicial days of the order a written recommendation as to whether the defendant should be required to undergo outpatient treatment, or be committed to the State Department of
 State Hospitals or to any other treatment facility. A person shall not be admitted to a State Department of State Hospitals facility or other treatment facility or placed on outpatient status under this section without having been evaluated by the community program director or a designee. The community program director or designee shall evaluate the appropriate placement for the defendant between a State Department of State Hospitals facility or the community-based residential treatment system based upon guidelines provided by the State Department of State Hospitals.

(ii) A defendant shall first be considered for placement in an outpatient treatment program, a community treatment program, or a diversion program, if any such program is available, unless a court, based upon the recommendation of the community program director or their
 designee, finds that either the clinical needs of the defendant or the risk to community safety, warrant placement in a State Department of State Hospitals facility.

(B) The court shall hear and determine whether the defendant lacks the capacity to make decisions regarding the administration of antipsychotic medication. The court shall consider opinions in the reports prepared pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 1369, as applicable to the issue of whether the defendant lacks the capacity to make decisions regarding the administration of antipsychotic medication, and shall proceed as follows:

(i) The court shall hear and determine whether any of the following is true:

(I) Based upon the opinion of the psychiatrist or
 licensed psychologist offered to the court pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 1369, the defendant lacks the capacity to make decisions regarding antipsychotic medication, the defendant’s mental disorder requires medical treatment with antipsychotic medication, and, if the defendant’s mental disorder is not treated with antipsychotic medication, it is probable that serious harm to the physical or mental health of the defendant will result. Probability of serious harm to the physical or mental health of the defendant requires evidence that the defendant is presently suffering adverse effects to their physical or mental health, or the defendant has previously suffered these effects as a result of a mental disorder and their condition is substantially deteriorating. The fact that a defendant has a diagnosis of a mental disorder does not alone establish probability of serious harm to the physical or
 mental health of the defendant.
